Utah statutes.
30-3-15.3.   Commissioners -- Powers.

Commissioners shall:

(1)  secure compliance with court orders;

(2)  require attendance at the mandatory course as provided in Section 30-3-11.3;

(3)  serve as judge pro tempore, master or referee on:

(a)  assignment of the court; and

(b)  with the written consent of the parties:

(i)  orders to show cause where no contempt is alleged;

(ii)  default divorces where the parties have had marriage counseling but there has been no reconciliation;

(iii)  uncontested actions under Title 78B, Chapter 15, Utah Uniform Parentage Act;

(iv)  actions under Title 78B, Chapter 12, Utah Child Support Act; and

(v)  actions under Title 78B, Chapter 14, Uniform Interstate Family Support Act; and

(4)  represent the interest of children in divorce or annulment actions, and the parties in appropriate cases.



Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

